Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 6
CORONER

Cross references:

For fees and compensation of coroners, see § 30-2-108.

30-10-601. Coroner - election - bond - insurance - authority.

Repealed.

A coroner shall be elected in each county for the term of four years, who, except as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, before entering upon the duties of office, shall give bond to the people of the state of Colorado of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board of county commissioners or, if the board is not in session, by the county clerk and recorder, subject to the approval of such board, the condition of which bond shall be in substance the same as that given by the sheriff. Such bond shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the proper county.

(1.5) In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage in an amount not less than twenty-five thousand dollars on behalf of the coroner to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the coroner while in office.

The coroner may declare an individual dead if the coroner finds the individual has sustained irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory function.

Source:

G.L.

§ 507.

G.S.

§ 611.

R.S. 08:

§ 1294.

C.L.

§ 8769.

CSA:

C. 45, § 116.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-1.

L. 56:

p. 129, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1439, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1275, § 2, effective April 18.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) repealed, p. 1834, § 4, effective August 6; (1)(a)(II) added by revision, pp. 1834, 1835, §§ 4, 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 561, § 21, effective August 11.

Cross references:

For the definition of death, see § 12-240-140.

30-10-601.5. Qualifications - fingerprints.

A person is eligible to hold the office of coroner if the person:

Is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of Colorado and of the county in which the person will hold the office of coroner;

Has earned a high school diploma or its equivalent or a college degree; and

Has given a set of fingerprints in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

A person who is nominated by a political party or for whom a nominating petition is filed for the office of coroner shall have a complete set of fingerprints taken by a qualified law enforcement agency and submit proof of such fingerprinting when filing a written acceptance pursuant to section 1-4-601 (3), 1-4-906, or part 10 of article 4 of title 1.

A person wishing to be a write-in candidate for the office of coroner shall have a complete set of fingerprints taken by a qualified law enforcement agency and submit proof of such fingerprinting when filing an affidavit of intent pursuant to section 1-4-1101, C.R.S.

A board of county commissioners shall not appoint a person to fill a vacancy in the office of coroner unless the person has had a complete set of fingerprints taken by a qualified law enforcement agency and has submitted proof of such fingerprinting to the board.

A law enforcement agency that takes fingerprints in accordance with subsection (2) of this section shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall report the results of the criminal history record check to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the person has been nominated for or is to be appointed to the office of coroner.

A person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any felony charge under federal or state law is unqualified for the office of coroner unless pardoned. The results of the criminal history record check performed in accordance with this subsection (3) shall be confidential; except that the county clerk and recorder may disclose whether a person is qualified or unqualified for the office of coroner.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1831, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 964, § 12, effective August 9.

30-10-601.6. Coroners standards and training board.

There is hereby created in the department of public health and environment the Colorado coroners standards and training board, referred to in this part 6 as the "C.C.S.T. board".

The C.C.S.T. board is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions under the department of public health and environment.

The C.C.S.T. board shall consist of eight members. The chairperson and the vice-chairperson of the C.C.S.T. board shall be elected annually by the members of the C.C.S.T. board with the requirement that the chairperson be either a coroner or a forensic pathologist.

The members of the C.C.S.T. board shall be appointed by the governor as follows:

A coroner of a county with a population of fifty thousand or more;

A coroner of a county with a population of less than fifty thousand but more than fifteen thousand;

A coroner of a county with a population of fifteen thousand or less;

A county commissioner of a county with a population of fifty thousand or more;

A county commissioner of a county with a population of less than fifty thousand;

A pathologist who is actively engaged in performing postmortem examinations for a county in this state and who is a member of the Colorado medical society;

A chief of police from a municipality in this state or a county sheriff; and

A district attorney from a judicial district in this state.

The governor shall appoint each member of the C.C.S.T. board for a term of three years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year.

If a county coroner, county commissioner, county sheriff, chief of police, or district attorney leaves that office, that person's term on the C.C.S.T. board shall expire. The governor shall appoint a suitable person to fill the vacancy on the C.C.S.T. board for the unexpired term.

The members of the C.C.S.T. board shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

The C.C.S.T. board may accept and expend gifts, grants, and donations to pay the direct expenses of the C.C.S.T. board. The C.C.S.T. board shall transmit all gifts, grants, and donations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the coroner training fund created in section 30-10-601.8 (5). Any unencumbered state money remaining in the fund upon the repeal of this section shall be transferred to the general fund.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1173, § 85, effective August 10, 2011.)

The department of public health and environment staff is not required to provide any financial support or perform any administrative duties related to the operation of the C.C.S.T. board.

The attorney general shall be the legal advisor to the C.C.S.T. board. A deputy or assistant attorney general chosen by the attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall attend each meeting of the C.C.S.T. board to provide legal counsel to the C.C.S.T. board as requested by the board.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1831, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2011:

(5) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1173, § 85, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(3)(a), (5)(a), and (6) amended and (7) added, (HB 14-1380), ch. 376, p. 1793, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(5)(a) and (6) amended, (HB 20-1397), ch. 213, p. 1030, § 2, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

IP(3)(b) and (3)(c) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 73, § 97, effective February 25; (2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3370, § 57, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

30-10-601.7. Duties of the Colorado coroners standards and training board.

In addition to its other duties set forth in this part 6, the C.C.S.T. board shall:

Develop a curriculum for a forty-hour training course for new coroners and approve the qualifications of the instructors who teach the course;

Approve training providers to certify coroners in basic medical-legal death investigation pursuant to section 30-10-601.8 (2); and

Approve training providers and programs used to fulfill the annual twenty-hour in-service training requirement specified in section 30-10-601.8 (3).

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1833, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2014:

(1)(c) amended, (HB 14-1380), ch. 376, p. 1794, § 2, effective July 1.

30-10-601.8. Training - fees - coroner training fund.

A person who is elected or appointed to the office of coroner for the first time shall attend, at the first opportunity after the election or appointment, a training course for new coroners of at least forty hours using the curriculum developed by the C.C.S.T. board. The course shall be prepared and presented by qualified instructors from the Colorado coroners association or another training provider approved by the C.C.S.T. board. At the request of a new coroner, the C.C.S.T. board may decide that a combination of education, experience, and training satisfies the requirement to complete the training course for new coroners.

A person who is elected or appointed to the office of coroner for the first time shall, within one year of taking office, obtain certification in basic medical-legal death investigation from the Colorado coroners association or another training provider approved by the C.C.S.T. board. The C.C.S.T. board may grant an extension of up to one year to obtain such certification for just cause. The C.C.S.T. board shall issue written findings of fact supporting the extension.

Each coroner shall complete a minimum of twenty hours of in-service training provided by the Colorado coroners association or by another training provider approved by the C.C.S.T. board during each year of the coroner's term. At the request of a coroner, the C.C.S.T. board may decide that a combination of education, experience, and training satisfies the requirement to complete twenty hours of in-service training annually.

The county shall pay the costs of new coroner and in-service training. The fees charged by the C.C.S.T. board for training programs may include costs incurred in the establishment and operation of the C.C.S.T. board.

The C.C.S.T. board shall by rule establish fees for training programs. All fees collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the coroner training fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the C.C.S.T. board for the purposes of this part 6. In accordance with section 24-36-114, C.R.S., all interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the general fund.

Each county coroner or his or her designee shall create a policy for the training of deputy coroners and make the policy available for public inspection.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1833, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2014:

(3) amended and (6) added, (HB 14-1380), ch. 376, p. 1794, § 3, effective July 1.

30-10-601.9. Enforcement.

If a coroner fails to comply with the requirements of section 30-10-601.8, the C.C.S.T. board shall notify the board of county commissioners that the coroner is not in compliance with the training requirements of section 30-10-601.8 and that state law requires the county commissioners to suspend the coroner's salary. Upon receipt of such notice, the board of county commissioners shall suspend the coroner's salary.

If the C.C.S.T. board determines that a coroner whose salary has been suspended in accordance with subsection (1) of this section is in compliance with the training requirements of section 30-10-601.8, the C.C.S.T. board shall notify the board of county commissioners that the coroner is in compliance with the training requirements and that state law requires the board of county commissioners to reinstate the coroner's salary with back pay. Upon receipt of such notice, the board of county commissioners shall reinstate the coroner's salary with back pay.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1834 § 3, effective August 6.

30-10-602. Coroner and deputy coroner - duties - oath or affirmation - bond - insurance.

The coroner of each county is authorized to appoint a deputy. Any such appointment shall be in writing and shall be filed in the office of the coroner. The coroner of each county may delegate any of the coroner's powers to one or more deputies who shall then have the same duties with respect thereto as the coroner has. Any act of a deputy shall be done in the name of the coroner and signed by the deputy performing such act. A deputy coroner shall hold office during and subject to the pleasure of the coroner. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each coroner and deputy coroner shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101 and file the bond required by law to be filed by the coroner.

In lieu of the bond required by subsection (1) of this section, a county may purchase crime insurance coverage on behalf of the deputy coroner to protect the people of the county from any malfeasance on the part of the deputy coroner while in office.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 307, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1295.

C.L.

§ 8770.

CSA:

C. 45, § 117.

L. 53:

p. 224, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-2.

L. 57:

p. 310, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-2.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1062), ch. 161, p. 562, § 22, effective August 11.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 697, § 24, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-603. Deputy coroner - appointment.

Every appointment of a deputy coroner and every revocation thereof shall be in writing, under the hand of the coroner, and shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county wherein such appointment or revocation is made.

Source:

L. 07:

p. 307, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 1296.

C.L.

§ 8771.

CSA:

C. 45, § 118.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-3.

30-10-604. Coroner shall act as sheriff, when.

When there is no sheriff in any county, it is the duty of the coroner to exercise all the powers and duties of the sheriff of his county until a sheriff is appointed or elected and qualified; and when the sheriff for any cause is committed to the jail of his county, the coroner shall be keeper of such jail during the time the sheriff remains a prisoner.

Source:

G.L.

§ 508.

G.S.

§ 612.

R.S. 08:

§ 1297.

C.L.

§ 8772.

CSA:

C. 45, § 119.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-4.

Cross references:

For powers and duties of coroner when acting as sheriff, see § 30-10-518; for substitute officers having same powers and compensation, see § 30-10-106.

30-10-605. When sheriff a party or disqualified.

Every coroner shall serve and execute process of every kind and perform all other duties of the sheriff when the sheriff is a party to the case, or where affidavit is made and filed as provided in this section, and in all such cases he shall exercise the powers and proceed in the same manner as prescribed for the sheriff in the performance of similar duties.

Whenever any party, his agent, or attorney makes and files with the clerk of the proper court an affidavit stating that he believes that the sheriff of such county by reason of either partiality, prejudice, consanguinity, or interest, will not faithfully perform his duties in any suit commenced or about to be commenced in such court, the clerk shall direct the original process in such suit to the coroner, who shall execute the process in like manner as the sheriff might or should have done.

Source:

G.L.

§§ 509, 510.

G.S.

§§ 613, 614.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1298, 1299.

C.L.

§§ 8773, 8774.

CSA:

C. 45, §§ 120, 121.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-5.

30-10-606. Coroner - inquiry - grounds - postmortem - jury - certificate of death.

The responding law enforcement agency shall notify the coroner when a death is discovered or confirmed as soon as practicable after the scene is safe and secure. The coroner shall immediately notify the district attorney or his or her designee if by prior agreement, and then at his or her discretion proceed to the scene to view the body. Upon arrival of the coroner, law enforcement shall make all reasonable accommodations to allow the coroner to collect time-sensitive information such as body and scene temperature, lividity, and rigor. The coroner, in cooperation with law enforcement, shall make all proper inquiry in order to determine the cause and manner of death of any person in his or her jurisdiction who has died under any of the following circumstances:

If the death is or may be unnatural as a result of external influences, violence, or injury;

Due to the influence of or the result of intoxication by alcohol, drugs, or poison;

As a result of an accident, including at the workplace;

When the death of an infant or child is unexpected or unexplained;

When no physician is in attendance or when, though in attendance, the physician is unable to certify the cause of death;

From a death that occurs within twenty-four hours of admission to a hospital;

Repealed.

From a disease which may be hazardous or contagious or which may constitute a threat to the health of the general public;

If the death occurs from the action of a peace officer or while in the custody of law enforcement officials or while incarcerated in a public institution;

When the death was sudden and happened to a person who was in apparent good health;

When a body is unidentifiable, decomposed, charred, or skeletonized; or

Circumstances that the coroner otherwise determines may warrant further inquiry to determine cause and manner of death or further law enforcement investigation.

(1.1) The coroner shall request that jurisdiction of a death be transferred to the coroner of the county in which the event which resulted in the death of the person occurred, with the jurisdiction effective upon the acceptance by the receiving coroner. The transfer shall be in writing, and a copy thereof shall be maintained in the offices of the transferring and receiving coroners. The district attorney from each county involved in the transfer shall be contacted prior to the transfer unless prior agreements have been established.

(1.2) (a) When a person dies as a result of circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section or is found dead and the cause of death is unknown, the person who discovers the death shall report it immediately to law enforcement officials or the coroner, and the coroner shall take legal custody of the body.

The body of any person who dies as a result of circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section shall not be removed from the place of death prior to the arrival of the coroner or his or her designee or without the authority of the coroner or his or her designee unless it is necessary to identify the victim, to protect the property from damage or destruction, or to preserve and protect evidence, or protect life, health, or safety. The coroner, in consultation with the district attorney or local law enforcement agency, shall facilitate the timely removal of the body to preserve and protect evidence. The coroner may order the removal of the body for further investigation or release the body to the next of kin if no further investigation is required by law enforcement.

If a suicide note related to the death is found at the place of death, the coroner or law enforcement agency according to a prior agreement shall take custody of the note as well as any other documentation related to the cause or manner of death as is appropriate. If there is no prior agreement, law enforcement shall have the authority to take custody of the suicide note and shall provide a copy of the suicide note to the coroner. The coroner shall have the authority to view the suicide note prior to receiving a copy.

In the case of a noncriminal investigation, the coroner in collaboration with local law enforcement shall identify the deceased, determine the deceased's next of kin, and notify the appropriate next of kin or other persons of the death.

In the case of a noncriminal investigation, in order to assist with the identification of the deceased, location and identity of next of kin, and determination of the cause and manner of death, the coroner, in cooperation with law enforcement, has the authority to collect, examine, and store, or request law enforcement to collect, examine, and store, any documents, evidence, or information, including information available in electronic devices such as phones or computers subject to the limitations in the fourth amendment to the United States constitution and section 7 of article II of the Colorado constitution.

When in the course of a coroner investigation, a death becomes suspicious or the possibility of criminal activity arises, the coroner shall immediately consult with the district attorney and law enforcement in the jurisdiction where the events that caused the death occurred.

In the case of a noncriminal investigation, the coroner may take custody of prescription medications dispensed to the deceased to assist in determining the cause and manner of death subject to the limitations in the fourth amendment to the United States constitution and section 7 of article II of the Colorado constitution. The coroner shall properly document, store, and dispose of the medications or request law enforcement to document, store, and dispose of the medications.

The coroner or his or her designee shall perform a forensic autopsy or have a forensic autopsy performed as required by section 30-10-606.5 or upon the request of the district attorney. Failure to comply with this section may be prosecuted as a violation of section 18-8-405, C.R.S.

(2.5) In the case of a noncriminal investigation, the coroner, in cooperation with the public administrator if applicable, may take appropriate measures to safeguard the property and its contents. The coroner may charge the costs of securing the premises against the estate of the deceased. A coroner who secures or safeguards the property and its contents is immune from civil liability for damage to or loss of the property or its contents.

(2.7) A coroner shall comply with information requests for statistical or research purposes from the department of public health and environment and the department of transportation.

When the coroner has knowledge that any person has died under any of the circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section, he may summon forthwith six citizens of the county to appear at a place named to hold an inquest to hear testimony and to make such inquiries as he deems appropriate.

In all cases where the coroner has held an investigation or inquest, the certificate of death shall be issued by the coroner.

Any certificate of death issued by a coroner shall be filed with the registrar and shall state the findings concerning the nature of the disease or the manner of death, and, if from external causes, the certificate shall state the manner of death. In addition, the certificate shall include the information described in section 25-2-103 (3)(b), C.R.S., whenever the subject of the investigation or inquest is under one year of age.

A copy of the certificate of death or affidavit of presumed death, including any related documents and statements of fact, shall be retained indefinitely in the applicable county in a secure location in an appropriate county facility accessible only to the county coroner or the coroner's designee and in a manner that is consistent with the county's record retention policy and federal law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an investigation, autopsy, or inquest in any case where death occurred without medical attendance solely because the deceased was under treatment by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a well-recognized church or religious denomination.

Notwithstanding sections 12-245-220 and 13-90-107 (1)(d) or (1)(g), the coroner holding an inquest or investigation pursuant to this section has the authority to request and receive a copy of:

Any autopsy report or medical information from any pathologist, physician, dentist, hospital, or health-care provider or institution if such report or information is relevant to the inquest or investigation; and

Any information, record, or report related to treatment, consultation, counseling, or therapy services from any licensed psychologist, professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, social worker, or addiction counselor, certified addiction counselor, unlicensed psychotherapist, psychologist candidate registered pursuant to section 12-245-304 (3), marriage and family therapist candidate registered pursuant to section 12-245-504 (4), licensed professional counselor candidate registered pursuant to section 12-245-604 (4), or person described in section 12-245-217, if the report, record, or information is relevant to the inquest or investigation.

The coroner or his or her designee shall, at the request of the district attorney or attorney general, release to the district attorney or attorney general any autopsy report or medical information described in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) that the coroner obtains pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6).

The coroner or his or her designee shall not release to any party any information, record, or report described in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) that the coroner obtains pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6).

Any person who complies with a request from a coroner or his or her designee pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the disclosure of confidential patient or client information.

Source:

G.L.

§ 511.

G.S.

§ 615.

L. 1887:

p. 233, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1300.

C.L.

§ 8775.

CSA:

C. 45, § 122.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-6.

L. 57:

p. 311, § 1.

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 462, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-6.

L. 81:

(1)(c) to (1)(h) amended and (1.1), (1.2), and (6) added, pp. 1439, 1440, §§ 2, 3, effective June 4.

L. 89:

(6) amended, p. 1276, § 3, effective April 18.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 402, § 15, effective April 17.

L. 2000:

(6) amended, p. 157, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

(6) amended, p. 735, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(6)(a)(II) amended, p. 1029, § 56, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(4)(c) added, p. 626, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1258), ch. 137, p. 477, § 2, effective May 4; IP(6)(a) and (6)(a)(II) amended, (SB 11-187), ch. 285, p. 1329, § 76, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1097), ch. 95, p. 304, § 3, effective April 4; (1) (d) repealed, (HB 13-1154), ch. 372, p. 2192, § 3, effective July 1; (6) (a) (II) amended, (HB 13-1104), ch. 77, p. 249, § 7, effective August 7.

L. 2019:

IP(6)(a) and (6)(a)(II) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1718, § 212, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(6)(a)(II) amended, (HB 20-1206), ch. 304, p. 1551, § 68, effective July 14.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 13-1097, House Bill 13-1104, and House Bill 13-1154 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For issuance of death certificate, see § 25-2-110; for postmortem examination by licensed physician, see § 12-240-137.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

(3) For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act repealing subsection (1)(d), see section 1 of chapter 372, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

30-10-606.5. When autopsy performed - jurisdiction - qualifications to perform - definition.

The coroner shall perform a forensic autopsy or have a forensic autopsy performed in accordance with the circumstances in the most recent version of the "forensic autopsy performance standards" adopted by the national association of medical examiners, when the death is apparently nonnatural and occurs in a facility or during services regulated by the department of human services, and when the death is the result of an automobile accident and a hospital physician has not documented the extent of the injuries.

If a person is involved in an incident that requires the person to be transported to a medical facility outside the county where the incident occurred and the person dies en route to or at the medical facility outside the county where the incident occurred, the coroner for the county where the incident occurred shall take possession of the body and shall comply with the provisions of this section.

Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2), all forensic autopsies required to be performed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be performed by a board-certified forensic pathologist.

A physician who has completed a forensic pathology fellowship and is practicing forensic pathology in Colorado and who is not a board-certified forensic pathologist as of May 4, 2011, may perform a forensic autopsy required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

A forensic pathologist who has completed a forensic pathology fellowship may perform forensic autopsies for four years from the date of completion of the fellowship before becoming a board-certified forensic pathologist.

A pathology resident or forensic pathology fellow may perform a forensic autopsy required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section under the direct supervision of a board-certified forensic pathologist.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "direct supervision" means supervision that is within the facility where a pathology resident or forensic pathology fellow is performing an autopsy and that requires a board-certified forensic pathologist's presence and availability for prompt consultation.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1258), ch. 137, p. 477, § 3, effective May 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 137, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

30-10-607. Talesmen - oath. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 512.

G.S.

§ 616.

R.S. 08:

§ 1301.

C.L.

§ 8776.

CSA:

C. 45, § 123.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-7.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1440, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 697, § 25, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

30-10-608. Coroner may issue subpoenas.

The coroner may issue subpoenas within his county for witnesses, returnable forthwith, or at such time and place as he therein directs; and witnesses shall be allowed the fees set forth in section 13-33-102, C.R.S.; and the coroner has the same authority to enforce the attendance of witnesses and to punish them and jurors for contempt in disobeying his process as a county court has when process issues in behalf of the state.

Source:

G.L.

§ 513.

G.S.

§ 617.

R.S. 08:

§ 1302.

C.L.

§ 8777.

CSA:

C. 45, § 124.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-8.

L. 64:

p. 222, § 49.

L. 73:

p. 1401, § 26.

30-10-609. Physicians summoned - compensation. (Repealed)

Source:

G.L.

§ 525.

G.S.

§ 629.

R.S. 08:

§ 1303.

C.L.

§ 8778.

CSA:

C. 45, § 125.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-9.

L. 57:

p. 312, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-9.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1097), ch. 95, p. 303, § 1, effective April 4.

30-10-610. Oath of witnesses.

An oath shall be administered to the witness in attendance as follows: "You do solemnly swear that the testimony which you shall give to this inquest, concerning the death of the person about whom this inquest is being held, shall be the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help you God."

Source:

G.L.

§ 514.

G.S.

§ 618.

R.S. 08:

§ 1304.

C.L.

§ 8779.

CSA:

C. 45, § 126.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-10.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1440, § 5, effective June 4.

30-10-611. Testimony written and subscribed - fees.

The testimony shall be reduced to writing, under the coroner's order, and subscribed by the witnesses, and the person writing such testimony shall be paid from the county treasury the same fees prescribed for jurors attending inquests concerning deaths. Such testimony, in the discretion of the coroner, may be taken down in shorthand by a competent stenographer, who shall first be sworn by the coroner to correctly take down such testimony and correctly transcribe the same. The stenographer shall receive the usual per diem and fees paid official court reporters for like services to be paid by the board of county commissioners. Upon the request of the coroner, the stenographer shall transcribe the testimony and transmit it to the coroner, and it shall not be necessary in such case for the witnesses to subscribe the same. If the testimony is not transcribed and transmitted, the stenographer shall file his name and address and the notes of the testimony with the district court, and the district court shall keep such materials for a period of seven years from the time of the transmittal of the coroner's inquisition. The coroner shall return his inquisition and list of witnesses to the district court, and such notes if transcribed and transmitted by such stenographer shall have the same force and effect as testimony written out under the coroner's order and subscribed by the witnesses.

Source:

G.L.

§ 515.

G.S.

§ 619.

L. 1887:

p. 245, § 1.

L. 07:

p. 308, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1305.

C.L.

§ 8780.

CSA:

C. 45, § 127.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-11.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1441, § 6, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For fees prescribed for jurors attending inquests over dead bodies, see § 13-33-101; for compensation of court reporters, see § 13-5-128.

30-10-612. Verdict of jury - form.

The jurors, having heard the testimony and having made all needful inquiries, shall return to the coroner their inquisition in writing, under their hands in substance as follows, stating the matters in the following form, suggested as far as found:

STATE OF COLORADO,

County of ..............
An inquisition held at ............, in ............ county, on the ............ day of ............ A.D. 20......, before .............., coroner of said county, concerning the death of .............. or person unknown, by the jurors whose names are subscribed; the said jurors upon their oaths, do say ............ (here state when, how, by what person, means, weapon, or accident he came to his death, and whether feloniously).
In Testimony Whereof, the said jurors have hereunto set their hands the day and year aforesaid.

Source:

G.L.

§ 516.

G.S.

§ 620.

R.S. 08:

§ 1306.

C.L.

§ 8781.

CSA:

C. 45, § 128.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-12.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1441, § 7, effective June 4.

30-10-613. When verdict kept secret.

If the inquisition finds that a crime has been committed on the deceased and names the person who the jury believes has committed it, the inquest shall not be made public until after the arrest, directed in section 30-10-614.

Source:

G.L.

§ 517.

G.S.

§ 621.

R.S. 08:

§ 1307.

C.L.

§ 8782.

CSA:

C. 45, § 129.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-13.

30-10-614. Coroner may order arrest - warrant.

If the person charged is present, the coroner may order his arrest by an officer or any person and shall then make a warrant requiring the officer or other person to take him before the county court.

If the person charged is not present and the coroner believes he can be taken, the coroner may issue a warrant to the sheriff of the county, requiring him to arrest the person and take him before the county court.

Source:

G.L.

§§ 518, 519.

G.S.

§§ 622, 623.

R.S. 08:

§§ 1308, 1309.

C.L.

§§ 8783, 8784.

CSA:

C. 45, §§ 130, 131.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-14.

L. 64:

p. 222, § 50.

30-10-615. Warrant - effect.

The warrant of a coroner in the above cases shall be of equal authority with that of the county courts; and when the person charged is brought before the county court, he shall be dealt with as a person held under a complaint in the usual form.

Source:

G.L.

§ 520.

G.S.

§ 624.

R.S. 08:

§ 1310.

C.L.

§ 8785.

CSA:

C. 45, § 132.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-15.

L. 64:

p. 222, § 51.

30-10-616. Contents of warrant.

The warrant of the coroner shall recite substantially the transactions before him, and the verdict of the jury of inquest leading to the arrest; and such warrant shall be a sufficient foundation for the proceeding of the county court instead of a complaint.

Source:

G.L.

§ 521.

G.S.

§ 625.

R.S. 08:

§ 1311.

C.L.

§ 8786.

CSA:

C. 45, § 133.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-16.

L. 64:

p. 223, § 52.

30-10-617. Coroner to make return to district court.

The coroner shall then return to the district court the inquisition, the written evidence, the name and address of the stenographer if required under section 30-10-611, and a list of the witnesses who testified as to material matter.

Source:

G.L.

§ 522.

G.S.

§ 626.

R.S. 08:

§ 1312.

C.L.

§ 8787.

CSA:

C. 45, § 134.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-17.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1441, § 8, effective June 4.

30-10-618. Burial expenses - when paid by county.

The coroner shall cause the body of a deceased person which he is called to view to be delivered to his friends, if there are any, but if not he shall cause him to be decently buried, the expenses to be paid from any property found with the body, or, if there is none, from the county treasury, by certifying an account of the expenses which, being presented to the board of county commissioners, shall be allowed by them if deemed reasonable and paid as other claims on the county.

Source:

G.L.

§ 523.

G.S.

§ 627.

R.S. 08:

§ 1313.

C.L.

§ 8788.

CSA:

C. 45, § 135.

CRS 53:

§ 35-6-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 35-6-18.